Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.305

Juvenile offender adjudicated of theft of motor vehicle, possession of stolen vehicle, taking motor vehicle without permission in the first degree, taking motor vehicle without permission in the second degree—Local sanctions—Evaluation.

If a juvenile is adjudicated of theft of a motor vehicle under RCW 9A.56.065, possession of a stolen vehicle under RCW 9A.56.068, taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.070(1), or taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.075(1) and is sentenced to local sanctions, the juvenile's disposition shall include an evaluation to determine whether the juvenile is in need of community-based rehabilitation services and to complete any treatment recommended by the evaluation.

[ 2007 c 199 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2007 c 199: See notes following RCW 9A.56.065.